DI-224 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &

SKYHOOK TEMS

DI3GH-03

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC |c1711/11toC 1713/13 | Height Control Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Inside each sensor, a brush integrated with the control sensor rotor shaft moves above the resistor, proving
linear output. The resistance value between the brush and resistor terminal changes in proportion to the
shaft rotation angle, so the fixed voltage applied to the resistor by the ECU is modified by the sensor and
output to the ECU as a voltage indication the shaft rotation angle.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

When the following condition is consisting and the abnormal

signal continuedfor 1 sec.atthevehiclespeed8km/h (5 . )
C1711/ 11 * Rightfront, left front, rear height control sensor
mph) or more:

C1712/12 » Each height control sensor circuit
/ Detecting the abnormal signal (Height control sensor termi- '9 reut
C1713/13 * Suspension control ECU

nal voltage of ECU is 0.3 V or less or 4.7 V or more) for
every 0.0 1 sec.andthatcontinuedfor0.2 sec.

HINT:
« CodeC 1711 / 11 correspondstotherightfront height control sensor circuit.
« CodeC 1712/ 12correspondstothe leftfront height control sensor circuit.
« CodeC 1713/ 13correspondstothe rear height control sensor circuit.
Fail safe function:
If a trouble occurs in the height control sensor circuit, the height control is prohibited after the ECU has ad-
justed the vehicle height to the standard (fluid pressure correspond to the standard height).
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DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVEHEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION & DI-225
SKYHOOK TEMS
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DI-226 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check output value of height control sensor.

IN CASE OF USING HAND-HELD TESTER:
PREPARATION:
(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLCS.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.
(c) Select the DATALIST mode on the hand-held tester.
CHECK:
Check that the vehicle height value of the height control sensor displayed by the hand-held tester is chang-
ing when pushing the "UP” or "TDOWN?” button of the height select switch.
OK:
Vehicle height value must be changing.

NG> Go to step 2.
OK \

Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).

INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:

(=) PREPARATION:

Remove the suspension control ECU with connectors still con-

nected.

CHECK:

(@  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(b) Measure voltage between terminals SHB and SHG of
suspension control ECU connector.

F05619 %
Voltage: Approx. 5V

NG> Check and replace suspension control ECU.
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SKYHOOK TEMS

2 | Check height control sensor.

F05330

F05327

OK

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM6 16E)

FRONT HEIGHT CONTROL SENSOR

PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnect the height control sensor connector.

(b) Remove the height control sensor.

CHECK:

(@) Connect3drybatteriesof  1.5Vinseries.

(b) Connectterminal 2tothe batteries’ positive (+) terminal,
andterminal 3tothe batteries’ negative ( -)terminal, then
apply voltage about4.5V betweenterminals 2and 3.

(c) Measurethevoltage betweenterminals 1 and3,whenthe
height control sensor link is slowly moved up and down.

OK:
Sensor Link Position Voltage
Max. HI Approx. 4.05V
N Approx. 2.25 V
Min. LO Approx. 0.45V

REAR HEIGHT CONTROL SENSOR

PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnect the height control sensor connector.

(b) Removethe height control sensor.

CHECK:

(@) Connect3drybatteriesof  1.5Vinseries.

(b) Connectterminal 1 tothe batteries’ positive (+) terminal,
andterminal 3tothe batteries’ negative ( -)terminal, then
apply voltage about 4.5V betweenterminals 2and 3.

() Measure the voltage between terminals 2 and 3, when the
height control sensor link is slowly moved up and down.

OK:
Sensor Link Position Voltage
Max. HI Approx. 4.05 V
N Approx. 2.25 V
Min. LO Approx. 0.45V

NG> Replace height control sensor.




DI-228 DIAGNOSTICS - ACTIVE HEIGHT CONTROL SUSPENSION &
SKYHOOK TEMS

3 | Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between height con-
trol sensor, fluid pressure sensor, fluid temp. sensor and suspension control
ECU (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Clear the DTC (See page DI-208).
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